Utah statutes.
53-2a-1009.   Other emergency powers of governor unaffected.

The powers vested in the governor under this part shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other emergency powers otherwise constitutionally or statutorily vested in the governor.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

